Hawaii statutes.
§651-2 Writ; issued when. The
plaintiff, in any action upon a contract, express or implied, at the time of
commencing the action, or at any time afterward before judgment, may have the
property of the defendant, or that of any one or more of several defendants,
which is not exempt from execution, attached in the manner hereinafter
prescribed, as security for the satisfaction of any judgment that the plaintiff
may recover, but no writ of attachment shall be issued:

(1) Against the State, or any political municipal
corporation, or subdivision thereof; or

(2) In circumstances where garnishment is authorized
under chapter 652. [L 1905, c 84, §2; am L 1909, c 60, §1; RL 1925, §2806; RL
1935, §4191; RL 1945, §10142; RL 1955, §233-2; HRS §651-2; am L 1977, c 33, §1;
gen ch 1985; am L 2016, c 55, §30]

Cross References

Exemptions from execution, see part III of this chapter.

Case Notes

Attachment available only where contract at issue also
establishes a debtor-creditor relationship for payment of money. 485 F. Supp.
1015 (1980).

Does not prohibit garnishment against municipal
corporations. 23 H. 564, 570 (1916).

Seizure of automobile under writ of attachment. 38 H. 279,
298 (1949).

Cited: 26 H. 342, 346 (1922).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next